Virginia statutes. Title 24.2. Elections.
Article 2. Virginia Voter Registration System.

§ 24.2-404.
(Effective until October 1, 2022) Duties of Department of Elections.

The Department of Elections shall provide for the continuing operation and maintenance of a central recordkeeping system, the Virginia voter registration system, for all voters registered in the Commonwealth.In order to operate and maintain the system, the Department shall:

Maintain a complete, separate, and accurate record of all registered voters in the Commonwealth.

Require the general registrars to enter the names of all registered voters into the system and to change or correct registration records as necessary.

Provide to each general registrar voter confirmation documents for newly registered voters and for notice to registered voters on the system of changes and corrections in their registration records and polling places.

Require the general registrars to delete from the record of registered voters the name of any voter who (i) is deceased, (ii) is no longer qualified to vote in the county or city where he is registered due to removal of his residence, (iii) has been convicted of a felony, (iv) has been adjudicated incapacitated, (v) is known not to be a United States citizen by reason of reports from the Department of Motor Vehicles pursuant to §

24.2-410

.1 or from the Department of Elections based on information received from the Systematic Alien Verification for Entitlements Program (SAVE Program) pursuant to subsection E, or (vi) is otherwise no longer qualified to vote as may be provided by law. Such action shall be taken no later than 30 days after notification from the Department. The Department shall promptly provide the information referred to in this subdivision, upon receiving it, to general registrars.

Retain on the system for four years a separate record for registered voters whose names have been deleted, with the reason for deletion.

Retain on the system permanently a separate record for information received regarding deaths, felony convictions, and adjudications of incapacity pursuant to §§

24.2-408

through

24.2-410

.

Provide to each general registrar, at least 16 days prior to a general or primary election and three days prior to a special election, an alphabetical list of all registered voters in each precinct or portion of a precinct in which the election is being held in the county, city, or town. These precinct lists shall be used as the official lists of qualified voters and shall constitute the pollbooks. The Department shall provide instructions for the division of the pollbooks and precinct lists into sections to accommodate the efficient processing of voter lines at the polls. Prior to any general, primary, or special election, the Department shall provide any general registrar, upon his request, with a separate electronic list of all registered voters in the registrar’s county or city. If electronic pollbooks are used in the locality or electronic voter registration inquiry devices are used in precincts in the locality, the Department shall provide a regional or statewide list of registered voters to the general registrar of the locality. The Department shall determine whether regional or statewide data is provided. Neither the pollbook nor the regional or statewide list of registered voters shall include the day and month of birth of the voter, but shall include the voter’s year of birth.

Acquire by purchase, lease, or contract equipment necessary to execute the duties of the Department.

Use any source of information that may assist in carrying out the purposes of this section. All agencies of the Commonwealth shall cooperate with the Department in procuring and exchanging identification information for the purpose of maintaining the voter registration system. The Department may share any information that it receives from another agency of the Commonwealth with any Chief Election Officer of another state for the maintenance of the voter registration system.

Cooperate with other states and jurisdictions to develop systems to compare voters, voter history, and voter registration lists to ensure the accuracy of the voter registration rolls, to identify voters whose addresses have changed, to prevent duplication of registration in more than one state or jurisdiction, and to determine eligibility of individuals to vote in Virginia.

Reprint and impose a reasonable charge for the sale of any part of Title 24.2, lists of precincts and polling places, statements of election results by precinct, and any other items required of the Department by law. Receipts from such sales shall be credited to the Board for reimbursement of printing expenses.

The Department shall be authorized to provide for the production, distribution, and receipt of information and lists through the Virginia voter registration system by any appropriate means including, but not limited to, paper and electronic means. The Virginia Freedom of Information Act (§

2.2-3700

et seq.) shall not apply to records about individuals maintained in this system.

The State Board shall institute procedures to ensure that each requirement of this section is fulfilled. As part of its procedures, the State Board shall provide that the general registrar shall mail notice of any cancellation pursuant to clause (v) of subdivision A 4 to the person whose registration is cancelled.

The State Board shall promulgate rules and regulations to ensure the uniform application of the law for determining a person’s residence.

The Department shall apply to participate in the Systematic Alien Verification for Entitlements Program (SAVE Program) operated by U.S. Citizenship and Immigration Services of the U.S. Department of Homeland Security for the purposes of verifying that voters listed in the Virginia voter registration system are United States citizens. Upon approval of the application, the Department shall enter into any required memorandum of agreement with U.S. Citizenship and Immigration Services. The State Board shall promulgate rules and regulations governing the use of the immigration status and citizenship status information received from the SAVE Program.

The Department shall report annually by October 1 for the preceding 12 months ending August 31 to the Committees on Privileges and Elections on each of its activities undertaken to maintain the Virginia voter registration system and the results of those activities. The Department’s report shall be governed by the provisions of §

2.2-608

and shall encompass activities undertaken pursuant to subdivisions A 9 and 10 and subsection E and pursuant to §§

24.2-404.3

,

24.2-404.4

,

24.2-408

,

24.2-409

,

24.2-409.1

,

24.2-410

,

24.2-410

.1,

24.2-427

, and

24.2-428

. This report shall contain the methodology used in gathering and analyzing the data. The Commissioner of Elections shall certify that the data included in the report is accurate and reliable.

History.

1970, c. 462, § 24.1-23; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 119; 1972, c. 620; 1973, c. 30; 1974, cc. 369, 428; 1975, c. 515; 1976, c. 616; 1978, c. 778; 1983, c. 348; 1993, c. 641; 1997, c. 801; 2000, cc. 510, 554; 2003, c. 1015; 2004, c. 428; 2005, c. 378; 2006, cc. 243, 926, 940; 2008, c. 379; 2009, cc. 865, 870, 874; 2011, c. 528; 2012, c. 686; 2013, cc. 425, 686, 725; 2014, c. 452; 2015, c. 740; 2018, c. 460; 2020, cc. 1064, 1065.

Section set out twice.

The section above is effective until October 1, 2022. For the version of this section effective October 1, 2022, see the following section, also numbered
§

24.2-404

.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2013, c. 725, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not become effective unless an appropriation of general funds effectuating the purposes of this act is included in a general appropriation act passed by the 2013 Session of the General Assembly, which becomes law.” Funding was provided in Item 87 F of Acts
2013, c. 806.

The 2013 acts were subject to preclearance by the Department of Justice pursuant to § 5 of the federal Voting Rights Act. However, on June 25, 2013, the United States Supreme Court held invalid Section 4 of the Voting Rights Act that outlines the formula for determining what jurisdictions are covered under the section 5 preclearance processes. See
Shelby County v. Holder, — U.S. —, 133 S. Ct. 2612, 186 L. Ed. 2d 651, 2013 U.S. LEXIS 4917 (2013).

Acts
2020, cc. 1064 and
1065, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to
§ 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $0 for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities and cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 510 and 554 are identical, and added subsection B.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 1015, inserted present subdivision 6; redesignated former subdivisions 6 through 9 as present subdivisions 7 through 10; and rewrote subdivision 7, which formerly read: “Provide to each general registrar, at least ten days prior to a general or primary election and three days prior to a special election, a list of all registered voters in the county or city, together with an alphabetical list of all registered voters in each precinct of the county, city, or town. These precinct lists shall be used as the official lists of qualified voters and shall constitute the precinct registered voter lists.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 428 added the next-to-last and last sentences in subdivision A 7.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 378 inserted the present third sentence in subdivision A 7.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 243 inserted clause (v) and made related changes in subdivision A 4; and added subsection C.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 926 and 940, effective January 1, 2007, are identical, and in subdivision A 4, inserted clause (v), redesignated former clause (v) as clause (vi) and made a related change.

Subdivision A 4 is set out in the form above at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 379 added the last sentence to the end of subdivision A 7.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 865, 870 and 874 are identical, and added subsection D.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 528 added the last two sentences in subdivision A 4; and added the last sentence in subdivision A 9.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 686 substituted “recordkeeping system” for “record keeping system” in the introductory paragraph of subsection A; and substituted “16 days” for “10 days” in the first sentence of subdivision A 7.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 425 added subdivision A 10 and redesignated former subdivision A 10 as subdivision A 11.

The 2013 amendment by c. 686 inserted “or from the State Board based on information received from the Systematic Alien Verification for Entitlements Program (SAVE Program) pursuant to subsection E” in subdivison A 4, and added subsection E.

The 2013 amendment by c. 725, effective July 1, 2014, in subdivision A 3, added “and voter registration cards containing the voter’s photograph and signature for free for those voters who do not have one of the forms of identification specified in subsection B of §

24.2-643

” at the end of the first sentence, and added the second through fifth sentences.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 452 added subsection F.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 740 substituted “Department” for “Board” or “State Board” throughout subsections A and B; substituted “Department of Elections” for “State Board” in the first paragraph of subsection A and the first sentence of subdivision A 4; in subdivision A 3, substituted “voter confirmation documents” for “voter registration cards” the first time it appeared in the first sentence, and substituted “voter photo identification cards” for “voter registration cards” the second time it appeared in the first sentence and in the second and last sentences, and deleted “containing the voter’s photograph and signature” from the end of the subdivision; added the last sentence of subsection B; substituted “Department” for “State Board” in the first and second sentences of subsection E and the first sentence of subsection F and for “Board” in the second sentence of F; and made stylistic changes.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 460, in subsection F, substituted “annually by October 1” for “annually by August 1” and “August 31” for “June 30” in the first sentence, inserted “be governed by the provisions of §

2.2-608

and shall” in the second sentence, and added the third and fourth sentences.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1064 and 1065 are identical, and deleted “and voter photo identification cards containing the voter’s photograph and signature for free for those voters who do not have one of the forms of identification specified in subsection B of §

24.2-643

. The Department shall promulgate rules and regulations authorizing each general registrar to obtain a photograph and signature of a voter who does not have one of the forms of identification specified in subsection B of §

24.2-643

for the purpose of providing such voter a voter photo identification card containing the voter’s photograph and signature. The Department shall provide each general registrar with the equipment necessary to obtain a voter’s signature and photograph and no general registrar shall be required to purchase such equipment at his own expense. Photographs and signatures obtained by a general registrar shall be submitted to the Department. The Department may contract with an outside vendor for the production and distribution of voter photo identification cards” at the end of subdivision A 3.

Law Review.

For survey of election law reform in Virginia, see 12 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 333 (1970).

For 2006 survey article, “Election Law,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 121 (2006).

For annual survey article, “Election Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 403 (2009).

For annual survey article, “Election Law and Government,” see 46 U. Rich. L. Rev. 119 (2011).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

4C M.J. Constitutional Law, § 129; 6B M.J. Elections, § 41.

§ 24.2-404.
(Effective October 1, 2022) Duties of Department of Elections.

The Department of Elections shall provide for the continuing operation and maintenance of a central recordkeeping system, the Virginia voter registration system, for all voters registered in the Commonwealth.In order to operate and maintain the system, the Department shall:

Maintain a complete, separate, and accurate record of all registered voters in the Commonwealth. Such system shall automatically register a person who has preregistered pursuant to §

24.2-403.1

upon that person becoming eligible for registration under §

24.2-403

or reaching 18 years of age, whichever comes first.

Require the general registrars to enter the names of all registered voters into the system and to change or correct registration records as necessary.

Provide to each general registrar voter confirmation documents for newly registered voters, including voters who were automatically registered pursuant to subdivision 1, and for notice to registered voters on the system of changes and corrections in their registration records and polling places.

Require the general registrars to delete from the record of registered voters the name of any voter who (i) is deceased, (ii) is no longer qualified to vote in the county or city where he is registered due to removal of his residence, (iii) has been convicted of a felony, (iv) has been adjudicated incapacitated, (v) is known not to be a United States citizen by reason of reports from the Department of Motor Vehicles pursuant to §

24.2-410.1

or from the Department of Elections based on information received from the Systematic Alien Verification for Entitlements Program (SAVE Program) pursuant to subsection E, or (vi) is otherwise no longer qualified to vote as may be provided by law. Such action shall be taken no later than 30 days after notification from the Department. The Department shall promptly provide the information referred to in this subdivision, upon receiving it, to general registrars.

Retain on the system for four years a separate record for registered voters whose names have been deleted, with the reason for deletion.

Retain on the system permanently a separate record for information received regarding deaths, felony convictions, and adjudications of incapacity pursuant to §§

24.2-408

through

24.2-410

.

Provide to each general registrar, at least 16 days prior to a general or primary election and three days prior to a special election, an alphabetical list of all registered voters in each precinct or portion of a precinct in which the election is being held in the county, city, or town. These precinct lists shall be used as the official lists of qualified voters and shall constitute the pollbooks. The Department shall provide instructions for the division of the pollbooks and precinct lists into sections to accommodate the efficient processing of voter lines at the polls. Prior to any general, primary, or special election, the Department shall provide any general registrar, upon his request, with a separate electronic list of all registered voters in the registrar’s county or city. If electronic pollbooks are used in the locality or electronic voter registration inquiry devices are used in precincts in the locality, the Department shall provide a regional or statewide list of registered voters to the general registrar of the locality. The Department shall determine whether regional or statewide data is provided. Neither the pollbook nor the regional or statewide list of registered voters shall include the day and month of birth of the voter, but shall include the voter’s year of birth.

Acquire by purchase, lease, or contract equipment necessary to execute the duties of the Department.

Use any source of information that may assist in carrying out the purposes of this section. All agencies of the Commonwealth shall cooperate with the Department in procuring and exchanging identification information for the purpose of maintaining the voter registration system. The Department may share any information that it receives from another agency of the Commonwealth with any Chief Election Officer of another state for the maintenance of the voter registration system.

Cooperate with other states and jurisdictions to develop systems to compare voters, voter history, and voter registration lists to ensure the accuracy of the voter registration rolls, to identify voters whose addresses have changed, to prevent duplication of registration in more than one state or jurisdiction, and to determine eligibility of individuals to vote in Virginia.

Reprint and impose a reasonable charge for the sale of any part of Title 24.2, lists of precincts and polling places, statements of election results by precinct, and any other items required of the Department by law. Receipts from such sales shall be credited to the Board for reimbursement of printing expenses.

The Department shall be authorized to provide for the production, distribution, and receipt of information and lists through the Virginia voter registration system by any appropriate means including, but not limited to, paper and electronic means. The Virginia Freedom of Information Act (§

2.2-3700

et seq.) shall not apply to records about individuals maintained in this system.

The State Board shall institute procedures to ensure that each requirement of this section is fulfilled. As part of its procedures, the State Board shall provide that the general registrar shall mail notice of any cancellation pursuant to clause (v) of subdivision A 4 to the person whose registration is cancelled.

The State Board shall promulgate rules and regulations to ensure the uniform application of the law for determining a person’s residence.

The Department shall apply to participate in the Systematic Alien Verification for Entitlements Program (SAVE Program) operated by U.S. Citizenship and Immigration Services of the U.S. Department of Homeland Security for the purposes of verifying that voters listed in the Virginia voter registration system are United States citizens. Upon approval of the application, the Department shall enter into any required memorandum of agreement with U.S. Citizenship and Immigration Services. The State Board shall promulgate rules and regulations governing the use of the immigration status and citizenship status information received from the SAVE Program.

The Department shall report annually by October 1 for the preceding 12 months ending August 31 to the Committees on Privileges and Elections on each of its activities undertaken to maintain the Virginia voter registration system and the results of those activities. The Department’s report shall be governed by the provisions of §

2.2-608

and shall encompass activities undertaken pursuant to subdivisions A 9 and 10 and subsection E and pursuant to §§

24.2-404.3

,

24.2-404.4

,

24.2-408

,

24.2-409

,

24.2-409.1

,

24.2-410

,

24.2-410

.1,

24.2-427

, and

24.2-428

. This report shall contain the methodology used in gathering and analyzing the data. The Commissioner of Elections shall certify that the data included in the report is accurate and reliable.

History.

1970, c. 462, § 24.1-23; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 119; 1972, c. 620; 1973, c. 30; 1974, cc. 369, 428; 1975, c. 515; 1976, c. 616; 1978, c. 778; 1983, c. 348; 1993, c. 641; 1997, c. 801; 2000, cc. 510, 554; 2003, c. 1015; 2004, c. 428; 2005, c. 378; 2006, cc. 243, 926, 940; 2008, c. 379; 2009, cc. 865, 870, 874; 2011, c. 528; 2012, c. 686; 2013, cc. 425, 686, 725; 2014, c. 452; 2015, c. 740; 2018, c. 460; 2020, cc. 1064, 1065; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 217.

Section set out twice.

The section above is effective October 1, 2022. For the version of this section effective until October 1, 2022, see the preceding section, also numbered
§

24.2-404

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess., c. 217, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2022.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 217, effective October 1, 2022, added the second sentence in subdivision A 2; and inserted “including voters who were automatically registered pursuant to subdivision 1” in subdivision A 3.

§ 24.2-404.1.
Commissioner of Elections to serve as state coordinator for the administration of the National Voter Registration Act.

The Commissioner of Elections shall be the chief state election officer responsible for the coordination of state responsibilities under the National Voter Registration Act (52 U.S.C. § 20501 et seq.).

History.

1996, cc. 72, 73; 2013, c. 542.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “52 U.S.C. § 20501 et seq.” was substituted for “42 U.S.C. § 1973gg et seq.” to conform to the editorial reclassification of Title 52, U.S.C., effective September 1, 2014.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 542, effective July 1, 2014, substituted “Commissioner” for “Secretary of the State Board.”

§ 24.2-404.2.
Repealed by Acts 2003, cc. 20 and 50.

Editor’s note.

Former §

24.2-404.2

, which created the National Voter Registration Act Coordinating Committee, was enacted by Acts 1999, c. 118.

§ 24.2-404.3.
Duty of Department of Elections; verification of registered voter lists.

On or before October 1 of each year, the Department shall conduct a match of the Virginia registered voter lists with the list of deceased persons maintained by the Social Security Administration.

History.

2009, c. 492; 2015, c. 740.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 740 substituted “Department” for “State Board.”

Law Review.

For annual survey article, “Election Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 403 (2009).

§ 24.2-404.4.
Exchange of registered voter lists with other states.

Pursuant to its authority under subsection A of §

24.2-405

and subsections B and C of §

24.2-406

, the Department of Elections shall request voter registration information and lists of persons voting at primaries and elections, if available, from the states bordering the Commonwealth to identify duplicate registrations, voters who no longer reside in the Commonwealth, and other persons who are no longer entitled to be registered in order to maintain the overall accuracy of the voter registration system.

Pursuant to its authority under subdivision A 10 of §

24.2-404

, the Department of Elections shall utilize data regarding voter registration and lists of persons voting at primaries and elections received through list comparisons with other states to identify duplicate registrations, voters who no longer reside in the Commonwealth, and other persons who are no longer entitled to be registered in order to maintain the overall accuracy of the voter registration system.

The Department shall compare the data received pursuant to subsections A and B with the state voter registration list and initiate list maintenance procedures under applicable state and federal law. The Department shall include in its report to the House and Senate Committees on Privileges and Elections, required by subsection F of §

24.2-404

, the progress of activities conducted under this section, including the number of duplicate registrations found to exist and the procedures that the Department and general registrars are following to eliminate duplicate registrations from the Virginia registered voter lists.

History.

2013, c. 435; 2015, cc. 713, 740; 2018, c. 460.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “subdivision A 10 of §

24.2-404

” was substituted for “subdivision 10 of §

24.2-404

” in subsection B.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 713 designated the former section subsection A, and therein deleted the last two sentences, which read: “Upon receipt of this data, the State Board shall compare it with the state voter registration list and initiate list maintenance procedures under applicable state and federal law. The State Board shall report to the House and Senate Committees on Privileges and Elections annually on the progress of activities conducted under this section, including the number of duplicate registrations found to exist and the procedures that the State Board and general registrars are following to eliminate duplicate registrations from the Virginia registered voter lists”; and added subsections B and C.

The 2015 amendment by c. 740 substituted “Department” for “State Board” throughout the section and “Department of Elections” for “State Board” in subsections A and B; and added the third sentence in subsection C.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 460, in subsection C, substituted “shall include in its report” for “shall report” and “required by subsection F of §

24.2-404

” for “annually on” in the second sentence, and deleted the former third sentence, which read: “All annual reports required to be filed by the Department shall be governed by the provisions of §

2.2-608

.”

§ 24.2-405.
Lists of registered voters.

The Department of Elections shall provide, at a reasonable price, lists of registered voters for their districts to (i) candidates for election or political party nomination to further their candidacy, (ii) political party committees or officials thereof for political purposes only, (iii) political action committees that have filed a current statement of organization with the Department of Elections pursuant to §

24.2-949.2

, or with the Federal Elections Commission pursuant to federal law, for political purposes only, (iv) incumbent officeholders to report to their constituents, (v) nonprofit organizations that promote voter participation and registration for that purpose only, and (vi) commissioners of the revenue, as defined in §

58.1-3100

, and treasurers, as defined in §

58.1-3123

, for tax assessment, collection, and enforcement purposes. The Department shall provide, at no charge, the courts of the Commonwealth and the United States with the lists for their districts for jury selection purposes no more than two times in a 12-month period and shall provide, at a reasonable price, such lists any other time in that same 12-month period. The lists shall be furnished to no one else and used for no other purpose. However, the Department of Elections is authorized to furnish information from the voter registration system to general registrars for their official use and to the Department of Motor Vehicles and other appropriate state agencies for maintenance of the voter registration system, and to the Chief Election Officers of other states for maintenance of voter registration systems.

The Department of Elections shall furnish, at a reasonable price, lists of the addresses of registered voters for their localities to local government census liaisons and their staffs for the sole purpose of providing address information to the United States Bureau of the Census. The Department of Elections shall also furnish, at a reasonable price, such lists to the Clerk of the Senate and the Clerk of the House of Delegates for the sole purpose of maintaining a database of constituent addresses for the General Assembly. The information authorized under this subsection shall be furnished to no other person and used for no other purpose. No list furnished under this subsection shall contain the name of any registered voter. For the purpose of this subsection, the term “census liaison” shall have the meaning provided in 13 U.S.C. § 16.

In no event shall any list furnished under this section contain the social security number, or any part thereof, of any registered voter except a list furnished to a court of the Commonwealth or of the United States for jury selection purposes, a commissioner of the revenue or a treasurer for tax assessment, collection, and enforcement purposes, or to the Chief Election Officer of another state permitted to use social security numbers, or any parts thereof, that provides for the use of such numbers on applications for voter registration in accordance with federal law, for maintenance of voter registration systems.

Any list furnished under subsection A shall contain the post office box address in lieu of the residence street address for any individual who has furnished at the time of registration or subsequently, in addition to his street address, a post office box address pursuant to subsection B of §

24.2-418

.

No recipient of a list furnished under this section shall publish on the Internet any of the information contained in such list as a list, database, or other similar searchable format or provide information contained in a list furnished under this section to a third party for such purpose.

History.

1970, c. 462, § 24.1-23; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 119; 1972, c. 620; 1973, c. 30; 1974, cc. 369, 428; 1975, c. 515; 1976, c. 616; 1978, c. 778; 1983, c. 348; 1993, cc. 144, 641; 1994, cc. 250, 656; 1995, c. 314; 1996, c. 251; 1999, c. 843; 2000, cc. 512, 556; 2001, cc. 612, 626; 2003, c. 1015; 2004, cc. 184, 410; 2006, cc. 787, 892; 2007, c. 318; 2009, c. 318; 2010, c. 452; 2015, c. 712; 2020, cc. 290, 369; 2022, c. 445.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 144 amended former § 24.1-23, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152 and Acts 1993, c. 641, cl. 6, effect has been given in this section, as set out above. In accordance with c. 144, the amendment added the second paragraph.

Acts 2004, c. 410, cl. 3, provides: “That the provisions of this act affecting uniformed and overseas voters as defined in the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act (42 U.S.C. § 1973ff [now 52 USC § 20301] et seq.) shall be applicable to any Federal Post Card Application received from such voter after November 4, 2003.”

The 1999 amendment,

effective March 29, 1999, in the first paragraph, added the subsection A designator, substituted “However” for “except that,” and inserted “and to the Department of Motor Vehicles and other appropriate state agencies for maintenance of the voter registration system. Further, and notwithstanding any other provision of law, multijurisdictional staffing by general registrars and their staffs shall be allowed for voter registration pilot projects, approved by the State Board, that are located at facilities of the Department of Motor Vehicles,” added subsection B, designated the last three paragraphs as subsections C, D and E, and in subsections D and E, inserted “subsection A of.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by c. 512 and 556 are identical, and deleted the last sentence of subsection A, referring to multijurisdictional staffing by general registrars and their staffs for voter registration pilot projects.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by cc. 612 and 626 are identical, and substituted “located in the Commonwealth” for “for his residence” near the end of subsections D and E; and substituted “issued by or under the authority of any court of competent jurisdiction, including but not limited to courts of the Commonwealth of Virginia” for “as described in §§ 16.1-253.1, 16.1-253.4, 16.1-279.1, and

18.2-60.3

” in subsection E.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 1015, in subsection A, inserted present clause (iv), and redesignated former clauses (iv) and (v) as present clauses (v) and (vi), and substituted “that promote” for “which promote” in clause (vi).

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 184 deleted “printed precinct” preceding “list furnished” near the beginning in subsection E; and added subsection F.

The 2004 amendment by c. 410, effective April 12, 2004, deleted “printed precinct” preceding “list furnished” near the beginning in subsection E.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 787 and 892 are identical, and substituted “§

24.2-949.2

” for “§ 24.2-908” in clause (iv) of subsection A.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 318 inserted “and to the Chief Election Officers of other states for maintenance of voter registration systems” at the end of subsection A; “or any part thereof” following “number” and “or to the Chief Election Officer of another state permitted to use social security numbers, or any parts thereof, that provides for the use of such numbers on applications for voter registration in accordance with federal law, for maintenance of voter registration systems” in subsection C.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 318, in subsection D, substituted “individual” for “active or retired law-enforcement officer, as defined in §

9.1-101

and in 5 U.S.C. § 8331(20) but excluding officers whose duties relate to detention as defined in paragraphs (A) through (D) of § 8331(20)” and “pursuant to subsection B of §

24.2-418

” for “located in the Commonwealth for use on such lists”; and deleted subsections E and F.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 452, in subsection A, inserted clause (vii) and made a related change; and in subsection C, inserted “a commissioner of the revenue of a treasurer for tax assessment, collection, and enforcement purposes.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 712 substituted “Department of Elections” for “State Board” throughout the section; substituted “shall provide” for “shall furnish” near the beginning of
the first sentence of subsection A; and deleted “of this section” preceding “shall contain” in subsection D.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 290 and 369 are identical, and in subsection A, deleted clause (i) and redesignated remaining clauses accordingly, and added the second sentence in the subsection.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 445 added subsection E.

Law Review.

For an article, “Governing Through Intermediaries,” see 85 Va. L. Rev. 1627 (1999).

For a commentary, “Pluralism With a Corporate Face: A Comment On Issacharoff and Ortiz,” see 85 Va. L. Rev. 1671 (1999).

For a commentary, “Political Parties as Donative Intermediaries,” see 85 Va. L. Rev. 1683 (1999).

For an article, “Politics By Other Means,” see 85 Va. L. Rev. 1697 (1999).

For a commentary, “It’s Not Just Talk,” see 85 Va. L. Rev. 1725 (1999).

For a commentary, “Market Failures and Failures of Markets,” see 85 Va. L. Rev. 1745 (1999).

For an article, “The Issue of Issue Advocacy: An Economic, Political, and Constitutional Analysis,” see 85 Va. L. Rev. 1761 (1999).

For a commentary, “Taking Issue With Issue Advocacy,” see 85 Va. L. Rev. 1793 (1999).

For a commentary, “On the Issue of Issue Advocacy,” see 85 Va. L. Rev. 1803 (1999).